Louisiana, session 2026, SB486.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:223(E)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§223. Advertisements for legal services
* * *
E. The following communications in attorney advertisements shall be
prohibited:
* * *
(3) Any advertisement for legal services through unsolicited direct, live,
or real-time telephone communication, including but not limited to a phone
bank, call center, or an automated dialing system, when a significant motive for
the communication is pecuniary gain. The prohibition shall apply to any
telephone communication made by the attorney or through the use of an
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1452 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 486
employee, agent, contractor, or third-party entity.
* * *